src/morphology/stemparts/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_KAUNISTUA















0    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PUNOA














0    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0     V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SÄILÖÄ














0    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_3SG_Ö  ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0     V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS    ;

LEXICON V_ÄLLISTYÄ













0    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0     V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS    ;



LEXICON V_HAUKKOA


0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS   ;

LEXICON V_NUOKKUA

0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS   ;

LEXICON V_KÄRKKYÄ

0:ky    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS  ;

LEXICON V_HARPPOA

0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:po    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LOPPUA

0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_LEPPYÄ

0:py    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:py    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:py   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KIVETTYÄ

0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VIITTOA

0:to    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:to    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:to    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:to   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:tu   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HERMOTTUA

0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:u    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MÄIKYÄ

0:ky    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:y    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ky   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:y   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:yt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ky    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TAKOA

0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:o    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MAUKUA

0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:’u   V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:’u   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:’u  V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:’ut  V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:’ut  V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SYÖPYÄ

0:py    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:vy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:vy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:py    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:py    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:py   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:py   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vy   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:vyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:py    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HIIPUA

0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:vu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:vu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SILPOA

0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:vo    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:vo    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:vo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:vot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:po    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_KIETOA

0:to    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:to    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:do    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:to    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:do    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:to    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:to    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:to   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:to   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:do   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:to    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_SILIYTYÄ

0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:dy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:dy    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:dy   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:dyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_ROHTUA

0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:du    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:du    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:du   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:dut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_VINKUA

0:ku    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:gu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:gu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ku    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ku    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ku   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ku   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:gu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:gut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:gut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ku    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_PENKOA

0:ko    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:go    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:go    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ko    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ko    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ko   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ko   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:go   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:got   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:got   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ko    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_TEMPOA

0:po    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:po    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:mo    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:po    V_BACK_3SG_O  ;
0:mo    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:po    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:po    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:po   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:po   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:mo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mot   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:po    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_AMPUA

0:pu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:mu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:mu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:pu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:pu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:pu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:pu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:mu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:mut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:pu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_MIELTYÄ

0:ty    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_EINF    ;
0:ly    V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_3SG_Y  ;
0:ly    V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE ;
0:ty   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:ly   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lyt   V_FRONT_PASSIVE  ;
0:lyt   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0    ;
0:ty    V_FRONT_DERIV_PCPS ;

LEXICON V_HUMALTUA

0:tu    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_EINF    ;
0:lu    V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_3SG_U  ;
0:lu    V_BACK_WEAK_PAST   ;
0:tu    V_BACK_STRONG_PAST ;
0:tu    V_BACK_CONDITIONAL  ;
0:tu   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE ;
0:tu   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N ;
0:lu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:lut   V_BACK_PASSIVE  ;
0:lut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0    ;
0:tu    V_BACK_DERIV_PCPS ;
